Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 10. PROPERTY AND CASUALTY INSURANCE

SUBTITLE G. POOLS, GROUPS, PLANS, AND SELF-INSURANCE

CHAPTER 2152. GROUP INSURANCE IN UNDERSERVED AREAS

Sec. 2152.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "residential property insurance" means insurance against loss to real or tangible personal property at a fixed location that is provided through a homeowners policy, residential fire and allied lines policy, or farm and ranch owners policy.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 2152.002. DESIGNATION OF UNDERSERVED AREAS. (a) The commissioner by rule may designate an area as an underserved area for personal automobile insurance or residential property insurance.

(b) In determining which areas to designate as underserved, the commissioner shall consider:

(1) whether the insurance described by Subsection (a) is not reasonably available to a substantial number of insurable risks and the availability of insurance in general; and

(2) any other relevant factor as determined by the commissioner.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 2152.003. AUTHORIZATION FOR ISSUANCE OF GROUP INSURANCE IN UNDERSERVED AREA. An insurer authorized to write property or casualty insurance in this state, including a Lloyd's plan and a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, that writes personal automobile insurance or residential property insurance in this state may write the personal automobile insurance or residential property insurance on a group basis in an underserved area designated by the commissioner.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 2152.004. EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN COVERAGE. Group insurance provided under this chapter may not include windstorm and hail insurance coverage for a risk eligible for that coverage under Chapter 2210.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 2152.005. FORMATION OF GROUP. A group may be formed solely to purchase insurance subject to this chapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 2152.006. RATES. Rates for coverage provided under this chapter are subject to the applicable statutes relating to the insurers providing the coverage.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 2152.007. POLICY FORMS AND CERTIFICATES. The commissioner shall adopt policy forms and certificates for use in underserved areas designated by the commissioner under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 2152.008. RULES. In addition to other rules adopted under this chapter, the commissioner may adopt any rules that are appropriate and necessary to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.